Utah statutes.
59-1-905.   Per diem and travel expenses -- Recommendations.

(1)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

(2)  Prior to the convening of the Legislature in annual general session, the review commission shall submit its recommendations to the members of the Legislature and to the governor.

